Illinois, session 104th, SB3776.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Educational Choice for Children Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative intent. 7    (a) This Act is intended to avail elementary and secondary 8students in this State of the additional funding opportunities 9recently signed into law offering a federal tax credit of up to 10$1,700 for individuals that donate to scholarship granting 11organizations, thereby increasing funding for these 12organizations to help families pay for their children to 13attend the elementary or secondary school of their choice.14    (b) This Act is intended to help students attending public 15schools in this State, as well as nonpublic schools, to cover 16all categories of educational expenses under the federal 17Educational Choice for Children Act of 2025, including fees, 18tutoring, educational therapies, transportation, technology, 19and other expenses. 20    (c) This Act is intended to ensure that students in this 21State are put on the same footing as other states that have 22similar programs at the state level and with any state that 23opts into the federal Educational Choice for Children Act of   SB3776- 2 -LRB104 20686 LNS 34185 b12025. 2    (d) This Act is intended to ensure that children in this 3State are not prohibited from benefiting from scholarship 4funds available to children in other states at no cost to State 5taxpayers. 6    Section 10. Definitions. 7    "Contribution" means a donation made by a taxpayer during 8the taxable year for providing scholarships as provided in 9this Act. 10    "Qualified contribution" means a charitable contribution 11of cash to a scholarship granting organization that uses the 12contribution to fund scholarships for eligible students, as 13defined in Section 25f of the Internal Revenue Code, and 14solely within the State pursuant to subsection (g) of Section 1525f of the Internal Revenue Code. 16    "Qualified elementary or secondary education expense" 17means any expense of an eligible student that is described in 18subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Section 19530 of the Internal Revenue Code.20    "Scholarship granting organization" means an entity 21meeting the definition of and requirements for a scholarship 22granting organization under Section 25f of the Internal 23Revenue Code. 24    "State Board" means the State Board of Education.    SB3776- 3 -LRB104 20686 LNS 34185 b1    Section 15. Powers and duties of the State Board. 2    (a) The State Board shall submit to the Secretary of the 3Treasury of the United States and publish on the website of the 4State Board a list of all scholarship granting organizations 5that meet the requirements of Section 25f of the Internal 6Revenue Code and that are located in this State. As part of the 7submission, the State Board shall certify its authority to 8submit the list on behalf of the State and comply with any 9other requirements of Section 25f of the Internal Revenue 10Code, its associated regulations, or other applicable guidance 11issued by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States. 12    (b) The State Board may establish rules governing the 13process and documentation necessary for an entity to 14demonstrate that it qualifies to be included as a scholarship 15granting organization on the list submitted by the State Board 16pursuant to subsection (a) and in accordance with Section 25f 17of the Internal Revenue Code, its associated regulations, or 18other applicable guidance issued by the Secretary of the 19Treasury of the United States. 20    (c) The State Board may enter into an agreement with other 21State agencies, including the Department of Revenue, to meet 22the requirements of this Section. 23    Section 20. Compliance with federal regulations. The State 24Board shall comply with all federal regulations pertaining to 25the administration of the federal tax credit established under   SB3776- 4 -LRB104 20686 LNS 34185 b1Section 25f of the Internal Revenue Code to ensure that this 2State is eligible to participate in taxable years beginning 3after December 31, 2026. 4    Section 25. Scholarships provided. In accordance with 5Section 25f of the Internal Revenue Code and any applicable 6federal regulations and guidance, qualifying scholarship 7granting organizations on the list submitted pursuant to 8subsection (a) of Section 15 may provide scholarships for any 9qualified elementary or secondary education expense, including 10nonpublic school expenses, to the extent allowed under federal 11law. 12    Section 30. State election for federal tax credit. 13Pursuant to Section 1 of Article IX of the Illinois 14Constitution and in accordance with Section 25f of the 15Internal Revenue Code, the General Assembly voluntarily elects 16the State to do all of the following: 17        (1) Participate in the federal tax credit established 18    under Section 25f of the Internal Revenue Code for 19    individuals who make qualified contributions to 20    scholarship granting organizations within this State. 21        (2) Identify scholarship granting organizations 22    located in this State. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.